Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2708.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Affordable Epinephrine Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Cost sharing." The following:(1) The share of the health care costs covered by a health insurance policy that an enrollee or covered individual pays out of pocket.(2) The term includes a deductible, coinsurance, copayment or similar charge.1234567891011121314151617 (3) The term does not include a premium, a balance billed amount from an out-of-network provider or the cost of a noncovered service."Department." The Insurance Department of the Commonwealth."Epinephrine delivery system." A single-use device used for the automatic injection or administration of a premeasured dose of epinephrine into the human body for the purpose of emergency treatment of an individual appearing to experience anaphylactic symptoms."Health insurance policy." A policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan issued by an insurer that provides medical or health care coverage. The term does not include any of the following:(1) An accident only policy.(2) A credit only policy.(3) A long-term care or disability income policy.(4) A specified disease policy.(5) A Medicare supplement policy.(6) A TRICARE policy, including a Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Uniformed Services (CHAMPUS) supplement policy.(7) A fixed indemnity policy.(8) A hospital indemnity policy.(9) A dental only policy.(10) A vision only policy.(11) A workers' compensation policy.(12) An automobile medical payment policy under 75 Pa.C.S. (relating to vehicles).(13) A homeowner's insurance policy.(14) Any other similar policies providing for limited 20260HB2708PN3784 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 benefits.Section 3. Coverage requirement.(a) Epinephrine delivery systems.--A health insurance policy offered, issued or renewed in this Commonwealth shall provide coverage for at a minimum, two epinephrine delivery systems:(1) prescribed by a health care provider; and(2) at an amount not to exceed thirty-five dollars ($35) annually regardless of the insured's deductible, copayment, coinsurance or any other cost-sharing requirement.(b) Deductibles and coinsurance.--The coverage required under subsection (a) may be subject to annual deductibles and coinsurance as deemed appropriate by the Insurance Commissioner. (c) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a health care group, general medical service corporation or hospital service corporation from reducing a covered individual's cost sharing to an amount that is lower than the amount specified in subsection (a).Section 4. Investigation and report.(a) Department investigation.--The department shall investigate pricing of epinephrine delivery systems to ensure that adequate pricing of prescription epinephrine delivery systems is achieved and to determine if additional consumer protections are necessary. As part of the investigation, the department shall gather, complete and analyze information concerning business practices, pricing, data and other information regarding epinephrine delivery systems manufacturers' roles in the current prices of epinephrine delivery systems.(b) Submission of report.--The department shall submit the findings of the investigation under subsection (a) in a report 20260HB2708PN3784 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to the General Assembly, which shall be made accessible to the public no later than one year after the effective date of this paragraph. The report shall include:(1) A summary of epinephrine delivery system pricing practices and factors that contribute to the pricing of health insurance policies.(2) Public policy recommendations to control and prevent overpricing of prescription epinephrine delivery systems made available to consumers in this Commonwealth.(3) Any other information that the department finds necessary to complete the report.Section 5. Regulations.The department may promulgate regulations as necessary to implement and enforce the maximum price established under section 3(a).Section 6. Applicability.This act shall apply as follows:(1) For a health insurance policy for which either rates or forms are required to be filed with the department, this act shall apply to a policy for which a form or rate is first filed on or after the effective date of this paragraph.(2) For a health insurance policy for which neither rates nor forms are required to be filed with the department, this act shall apply to a policy issued or renewed on or after 180 days from the effective date of this paragraph.Section 7. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2708PN3784 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627